Wyoming, session 2026, SF0046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-25-102(a)(xvi) and 11-25-303(d)
and (e) are amended to read:
11-25-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xvi) "Establishment" means a single physical
place of business that operates as a truck stop, smoke shop
or that is licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic liquor
or malt beverages for consumption on the licensed or
permitted premises under W.S. 12-2-203(g), 12-4-201,
12-4-301, 12-4-401, 12-4-407, 12-4-413, 12-4-414 or
12-4-415;
11-25-303. Restrictions on operation of skill based
amusement games.
(d) Skill based amusement games shall only be located
for play at an establishment, except as provided in this
subsection and subsection (e) of this section. For
establishments that are licensed or permitted to sell
alcoholic liquor or malt beverages, skill based amusement
games shall only be located in the physical area in which
alcoholic liquor or malt beverages are offered for sale. An
operator shall not locate a skill based amusement game in
an area of the establishment into which a person under the
age of twenty-one (21) years may enter. An operator shall
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
conspicuously mark each area of the establishment
containing a skill based amusement game as an age
restricted area. The operator shall not allow a person
under the age of twenty-one (21) years to play a skill
based amusement game.
(e) The following shall apply to establishments
lawfully operating under prior law:
(i) Any operator who, before September 14, 2022
had a skill based amusement game located at a place of
business that does not meet the definition of
"establishment" in W.S. 11-25-102(a)(xvi) on April 1, 2023
shall be authorized to continue operating skill based
amusement games if the operator otherwise meets the
requirements to operate a skill based amusement game;.
(ii) Any operator who, before April 1, 2026, had
a skill based amusement game located at a place of business
that does not meet the definition of "establishment" in
W.S. 11-25-102(a)(xvi) on April 1, 2026 shall be authorized
to continue operating the skill based amusement game
subject to the conditions of the existing permit until the
term of the permit expires. Except as provided in paragraph
(i) of this subsection, on and after April 1, 2026, a place
of business that does not meet the definition of
"establishment" under W.S. 11-25-102(a)(xvi) shall not be
eligible for permit renewal.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3